dictsource/ha_rules
// Hausa translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded


.group a
        a        a
   
.group b
        b        b

.group c
        c        c

.group d
        d        d

.group e
        e        e
 
.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g

.group h
        h        h

.group i
        i        i
      
.group j
        j        J

.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n

.group o
        o        o
    
.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        k

.group r
        r        r

.group s
        s        s

.group t
        t        t

.group u
        u        u
		
.group v
        v        b

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        z

.group y
        y        y

.group z
        z        z

.group
        $        dala
        %        ƙima

        *        alama
    *)  * (*
        **
   **)  * (_     _::
